Utah statutes.
57-12-10.   Displacing agency may contract for services or function through
another agency.
To prevent unnecessary expense and duplication of functions and to promote
uniform and effective administration of relocation assistance programs for
displaced persons, the displacing agency may enter into contracts with any
person for services in connection with these programs, or may carry out its
functions under this act through any agency or any federal agency or
instrumentality.
